Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-813
Judicial officeholders; subject to sections.

All judicial officeholders who are subject to the terms and provisions of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska, as provided by the Constitution of Nebraska or by law, shall be subject to the terms and provisions of sections 24-813 to 24-818.

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 1, p. 477.